Massachusetts, session 194th, H3673.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation shall conduct a comprehensive noise study along interstate
highways in the towns of Bedford, Burlington, and the city of Woburn to determine the ambient
noise level generated by traffic and the traffic-related noise impact on surrounding areas. The
department shall make recommendations for noise abatement methods, including but not limited
to a highway noise barrier. The comprehensive noise study shall be conducted by an acoustical
engineer employed by or on behalf of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. The
results of the study and the department recommendations shall be filed with the chairs of the
joint committee on transportation and the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate on
or before June 1, 2026.
of 1